Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Criminal Records and Statistics
17.169.
Definitions for KRS 17.169, 17.170, and 17.175.

As used in this section and KRS

17.170

and

17.175

, the following definitions shall apply:

“DNA sample” or “deoxyribonucleic acid sample” means a blood or swab specimen from a person, as prescribed by administrative regulation, that is required to provide a DNA sample pursuant to KRS

17.170

or

17.510

, that shall be submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for law enforcement identification purposes and inclusion in law enforcement identification databases; and

“Authorized personnel” means an agent of state government who is properly trained in DNA sample collection pursuant to administrative regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 158, §
9, effective July 1, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 105, § 1, effective March 27, 2009.

17.170.
Maintenance of DNA samples collected before March 27, 2009 — Persons required to provide DNA sample — Persons and procedures authorized for DNA sample collection — Administrative regulation — Penalties for refusing to provide DNA sample or tampering with samples or containers.

Any DNA sample collected pursuant to the law in effect prior to March 27, 2009, shall be maintained and used pursuant to this section and KRS

17.175

and

17.510

.

The following persons shall have a DNA sample collected by authorized personnel:

Any person convicted on or after March 27, 2009, of a felony offense under the Kentucky Revised Statutes; or

Any juvenile who was at least fourteen (14) years of age at the time of the commission of the offense and who stands adjudicated delinquent of being a public offender by a court of competent jurisdiction, of:

Any felony offense in KRS Chapter 510;

Incest as defined in KRS

530.020

;

Criminal attempt or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense identified in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph; or

Being a juvenile sexual offender under KRS

635.510

.

Any person who is required to register as a sex offender under KRS

17.510

who is not otherwise required to submit to a DNA sample collection under this section or KRS

17.510

, including those persons convicted of a felony or adjudicated as a public offender on offenses in other jurisdictions as identified in KRS 17.510(6) and (7), shall have a DNA sample collected by authorized personnel.

Any person who is required to provide a DNA sample pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and who is released from custody upon sentencing or adjudication shall immediately report to the local probation and parole office and shall have a DNA sample collected by authorized personnel.

A DNA sample shall be obtained in an approved manner by authorized personnel, a physician, registered nurse, phlebotomist, medical technician, or medical technologist, and packaged with supplies and containers provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet. No civil liability shall attach to any person authorized to obtain the DNA sample as provided by this section as a result of the act of obtaining the DNA sample from any person, provided the procedure was done according to administrative regulations by the cabinet.

Authorized personnel collecting DNA samples under this section or KRS

17.510

are not engaging in the practice of medicine pursuant to KRS

311.550

.

Any person required to provide a DNA sample under this section or KRS

17.510

who, after receiving notice of the requirement to provide a DNA sample, knowingly refuses to provide such DNA sample, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for each separate violation of the offense.

Any person who tampers or attempts to tamper with any DNA sample collected under this section or its container without lawful authority shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Repealed and reenact. Acts 2009, ch. 105, § 2, effective March 27, 2009.

17.171.
Application of KRS 17.170 to DNA evidence in cases involving minors. [Repealed.]

17.172.
Application of KRS 17.170 to DNA evidence in burglary cases. [Repealed.]

17.173.
Application of KRS 17.170 to DNA evidence in capital cases and certain felony cases. [Repealed.]

17.174.
Application of KRS 17.171 and 17.172 to public offenders. [Repealed.]

17.175.
Centralized database for DNA identification records — Analysis and classification of evidence — Exemption from KRS 61.870 to 61.884 — Expungement of information and destruction of DNA sample — Penalty for unlawful use of DNA database identification system.

A centralized database of DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) identification records for convicted or adjudicated offenders, crime scene specimens, unidentified human remains, missing persons, and close biological relatives of missing persons shall be established in the Department of Kentucky State Police under the direction, control, and supervision of the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory. The established system shall be compatible with the procedures set forth in a national DNA identification index to ensure data exchange on a national level.

The purpose of the centralized DNA database is to assist federal, state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies within and outside the Commonwealth in the identification, detection, or exclusion of individuals who are subjects of the investigation or prosecution of sex-related crimes, violent crimes, or other crimes and the identification and location of missing and unidentified persons.

The Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory shall receive, analyze, and classify DNA samples received from the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and other sources, and shall file the DNA results in the centralized databases for law enforcement identification and statistical purposes. The department shall analyze and classify all sexual assault evidence collection kits it receives. In cases where a suspect has been identified, the department may give priority to analysis and classification of sexual assault evidence collection kits where the reference standard for comparison is provided with the kit. Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, by July 1, 2018, the average completion rate for this analysis and classification shall not exceed ninety (90) days, and by July 1, 2020, the average completion rate for this analysis and classification shall not exceed sixty (60) days.

Failure to meet the completion time goals established in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be a basis for a dismissal of a criminal action or a bar to the admissibility of evidence.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, by August 1 of each year, report to the Legislative Research Commission the yearly average completion rate for the immediately preceding five (5) fiscal years.

With approval by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in situations in which an equipment casualty necessitates the expedited acquisition or repair of laboratory equipment required for the analysis of evidence, the acquisition or repair shall be exempt from the Finance and Administration Cabinet’s competitive bidding process for both acquisition and repair purposes. Each time the authority granted by this paragraph is used, the equipment acquisition or repair shall be fully documented within thirty (30) days by the agency head in a written or electronic letter to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, attached to an ordering or payment document in the state’s procurement system, which shall include:

An explanation of the equipment acquired or repaired;

The name of the vendor selected;

The amount of procurement;

Other price quotations obtained; and

The basis for selection of the vendor.

To the extent appropriated funds are insufficient to meet the average completion time goals established in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory shall no longer be required to meet the average completion time goals.

DNA identification records produced from the samples are not public records but shall be confidential and used only for law enforcement purposes. DNA identification records shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

DNA identification records produced from evidence collected as a result of an examination performed under KRS

216B.400

that are voluntarily submitted solely for elimination purposes shall not be checked against or included in the centralized database created pursuant to this section or any other database.

A person whose DNA profile has been included in the data bank pursuant to this chapter may request expungement on the grounds that the conviction or adjudication on which the authority for including the DNA profile was based has been reversed and the case dismissed, or that the person successfully completed the pretrial diversion program under KRS

533.258

and the charges were dismissed-diverted. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall expunge all identifiable information in the data bank pertaining to the person and destroy all samples from the person upon receipt of:

A written request for expungement pursuant to this section; and

Either:

A certified copy of the court order reversing and dismissing the conviction or adjudication; or

A certified copy of the court order deeming the charges dismissed-diverted.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the DNA database identification system to include procedures for collection of DNA samples and the database system usage and integrity.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall destroy all DNA samples that are not entered into the DNA database identification system.

Any person who disseminates, receives, or otherwise uses or attempts to use information in the DNA database identification system, knowing that such dissemination, receipt, or use is for a purpose other than authorized by this section, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 175, §
2, effective July 14, 1992; 2002, ch. 154, §
9, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, §
92, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 158, §
11, effective July 1, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 105, effective March 27, 2009; 2016 ch. 58, § 3, effective April 8, 2016; 2022 ch. 169, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 11 provided that that Act shall be known as the Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence (SAFE) Act of 2016. This statute was amended in Section 3 of that Act.

(5/1/2003). KRS

17.177

(2002 Ky. Acts ch. 154, sec. 11) provides that “actual compliance with the provisions of [KRS

17.175

and four other KRS sections] may be delayed until funding is available for their full implementation. . . As a section is implemented, the Reviser of Statutes shall be notified by the Secretary of Justice, in writing, as to the date of implementation.”

In a letter dated April 15, 2003, the Secretary of the Justice Cabinet notified the Reviser of Statutes that KRS

17.175

and the other four KRS sections have been implemented, effective May 1, 2003.

17.176.
Probative value of DNA test — Submission of evidence by parties in case — Fees and costs.

In addition to the requirements specified in KRS

422.285

, any evidence submitted for testing and analysis pursuant to KRS

422.285

or

422.287

shall be of probative value. When the motion is filed with the court requesting testing and analysis of evidence pursuant to this section, the applicant shall include sufficient information about the evidence, the necessity for its testing and analysis, and its applicability to the proceeding for a court to make a determination of the probative value of the evidence proposed to be tested and analyzed.

The prosecution, with a court order issued pursuant to this section, may submit not more than five (5) items of evidence for testing and analysis by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory or another laboratory selected by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory. In capital cases, the tests shall be performed without charge to the prosecution. The cost of testing and analysis of any items of evidence in excess of the five (5) initial items to be tested and analyzed shall be borne by the agency or person requesting the testing and analysis. Any additional item of evidence submitted for testing and analysis shall be accompanied by the court order specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The defense, with a court order issued pursuant to this section, may submit not more than five (5) items of evidence for testing and analysis by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory or another laboratory selected by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory. In capital cases, the tests shall be performed without charge to the defense. The cost of testing and analysis of any item of evidence in excess of the five (5) initial items to be tested and analyzed shall be borne by the agency or person requesting the testing and analysis. Any additional item of evidence submitted for testing and analysis shall be accompanied by the court order specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Any other party in a criminal case, with permission of the court after a specific showing of necessity for testing and analysis, together with the items specified in subsection (1) of this section, may submit an item of evidence for testing and analysis by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory or another laboratory selected by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for testing and analysis. The cost of testing and analysis of any item of evidence permitted to be submitted by the court shall be borne by the person or organization requesting the testing and analysis.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate by administrative regulation a uniform schedule of fees to be charged for testing and analysis conducted pursuant to KRS

422.285

or

422.287

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 154, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 93, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 77, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2002). Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in the second sentence of subsections (2) and (3) of this section by inserting “of” after the first appearance of “analysis” in each of those sentences.

17.177.
Effective dates and implementation of legislation relating to DNA testing. [Repealed.]

17.180.
Automated fingerprint identification system.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall design, implement, and maintain an automated fingerprint identification system.

The automated fingerprint identification system shall be compatible with any similar system required by the federal government for inclusion of state information in federal criminal justice databases.

The Commonwealth shall provide and maintain in every detention center the automated fingerprint identification system equipment and programs required by the Department of Kentucky State Police through administrative regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 29, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 95, effective June 26, 2007.

17.185.
Request to Department of Kentucky State Police to conduct background check on oneself through name-based or fingerprint-supported search — Definitions for section — Prerequisites and limitations on search and release of information — Fees — Administration regulations.

As used in this section:

“Fingerprint card” means the standard Federal Bureau of Investigation FD-258 fingerprint card;

“Fingerprint-supported background check” means a statewide search of the centralized criminal history record information system created and maintained by the Commonwealth utilizing the fingerprints of the subject of the background check. This shall not include a national check by the Federal Bureau of Investigation unless other provisions require a national check; and

“Name-based background check” means a statewide search of the centralized criminal history record information system created and maintained by the Commonwealth utilizing the name, date of birth, and Social Security number of the subject of the background check. This shall not include a national check by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, a person may request the Department of Kentucky State Police to conduct a name-based or fingerprint-supported background check of himself or herself and release the results to any person designated by the requester.

A person requesting a fingerprint-supported background check on himself or herself shall be fingerprinted by a law enforcement agency or other agency approved by the Department of Kentucky State Police to submit fingerprints. The fingerprinting agency shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police. The fingerprinting agency may charge a fee, not to exceed the actual cost of processing the request.

A request for a name-based or fingerprint-supported background check shall be submitted in a manner approved by the Department of Kentucky State Police.

The Department of Kentucky State Police may charge a fee for conducting a background check, not to exceed the actual cost of processing the request, to be paid by the requester, except that a convenience fee of ten dollars ($10) may be assessed for electronic requests and shall be retained by the Department of Kentucky State Police.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 60, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 159, § 57, effective July 14, 2018.

17.190.
Emergency requests for call location information.

For purposes of this section:

“Call location information” means the best available location information, including but not limited to information obtained using historical cellular site information or a mobile locator tool;

“Emergency responder” has the same meaning as in KRS

194A.400

;

“Law enforcement agency” means any lawfully organized investigative agency, sheriff’s office, police unit, or police force of state, county, urban-county government, charter county, city, consolidated local government, or a combination of these, responsible for the detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws, and excludes constables.

“Public safety answering point” has the same meaning as in KRS

65.750

;

“Wireless communications device” means any wireless electronic communication device that provides for voice or data communication between two (2) or more parties, including a mobile or cellular telephone; and

“Wireless telecommunications carrier” means a provider of commercial mobile radio services, including all broadband personal communications services, wireless radio telephone services, geographic area specialized and enhanced specialized mobile radio services, and incumbent wide area specialized mobile radio licenses, which offer real-time, two-way voice services interconnected with the public switched telephone network and doing business in this Commonwealth.

Upon a request from a public safety answering point or law enforcement agency, a wireless telecommunications carrier shall provide call location information concerning the wireless communications device of a wireless telecommunications user to the requesting public safety answering point or law enforcement agency, in order to respond to a call for emergency services or in an emergency situation that involves the imminent risk of death or serious physical injury.

Local emergency responders seeking call location information under this section shall direct inquiries to either a public safety answering point or a law enforcement agency, and the highest ranking person on duty at the public safety answering point or a law enforcement agency shall determine, in consultation with the emergency responders in the jurisdiction in which the emergency call or situation arose, whether the conditions under paragraph (a) of this subsection are met.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, nothing in this section prohibits a wireless telecommunications carrier from establishing protocols by which the carrier could voluntarily disclose call location information.

No cause of action shall lie in any court against any wireless telecommunications carrier or its officers, employees, or agents for providing call location information while acting in good faith and in accordance with this section.

In order to facilitate requests for call location information in accordance with this section, all wireless telecommunications carriers and all resellers of wireless telecommunications doing business in the Commonwealth shall submit emergency contact information to:

The Department of Kentucky State Police, for dissemination to law enforcement agencies; and

The Kentucky 911 Services Board, as created in KRS

65.7623

, for dissemination to public safety answering points.

The contact information required under this subsection shall be submitted annually, or immediately upon any change in contact information.

All public safety answering points and law enforcement agencies shall develop and maintain policies and procedures regarding this section.

Call location information gathered pursuant to this section shall not be disclosed to any party who is not officially involved in the underlying emergency response.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 148, § 1.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). 2019 Ky. Acts ch. 148, sec. 2 provides that this statute as created in Section 1 of that Act may be cited as the Leah Carter Act.